apertium-sqi.sqi.dix
    <pardef n="z/iej__vblex" c="Class I:IX">
      <e><p><l>iej</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ien</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ien</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iejmë</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ieni</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iejnë</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>jeva</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jeve</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jeu</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iem</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iet</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ien</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ieja</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ieje</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iente</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ienim</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ienit</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ienin</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ihem</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ihe</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ihet</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ihemi</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iheti</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ihen</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>jeva</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jeve</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>je</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iem</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iet</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ien</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ihesha</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iheshe</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ihej</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iheshim</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iheshit</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iheshin</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="nactv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>iej</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iesh</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iejë</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iejme</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ieni</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iejnë</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>jefsha</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jefsh</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jefë</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jefshim</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jefshit</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jefshin</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pio"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>iekam</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pra"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ieke</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pra"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ieka</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pra"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iekemi</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pra"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iekeni</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pra"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iekan</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pra"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>iekësha</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pia"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iekëshe</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pia"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iekësh</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pia"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iekëshim</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pia"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iekëshit</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pia"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iekëshin</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pia"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>iej</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ieni</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ier</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ier</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ieri</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ieri</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ieri</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ierit</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ierit</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ierit</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ierit</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ierit</l><r>iej<s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ziej"><i>z</i><par n="z/iej__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ndiej"><i>nd</i><par n="z/iej__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="përziej"><i>përz</i><par n="z/iej__vblex"/></e>
